
respects the Catalan language was far more widespread as a language of
culture than Castilian was in the early thirteenth century. Yet, for material
transactions and the affairs of everyday life, the power of notaries and their
formulaic Latin was still too great to be overthrown.
The Conquest of the South and Structural
Transformations: Castile and the Crown of Aragon
During the first half of the thirteenth century, Castile, Portugal, the kingdom
of Asturias–León, and the Crown of Aragon (Aragon and Catalonia) made
impressive gains in al-Andalus. Ferdinand III’s conquest of Córdoba in 1236
and of Seville in 1248 transformed the structure of Castilian society. With
the settlement of Christians in the region of the Guadalquivir, there were
no immediate technological gains in the exploitation of the land, nor was
there an increase in the production of food. On the contrary, the conquest
and the rebellion of the Mudejars in the early 1260s, and their subsequent
expulsion from the land, disrupted the normal pattern of irrigation,
cultivation, and harvest. Galloping inflation and unsuccessful efforts by
Alfonso X in 1252, 1258, and 1268 to deal with inflation through price
controls and sumptuary laws were clear signs of the deteriorating Castilian
economy. In addition, petitions for remission of taxes by impoverished
municipalities, demographic dislocations, the rise of anti-Semitic legislation (most of it economic in nature), localized famines, lawlessness in the
countryside, civil war, and debasement of the coinage were clear manifestations or examples of some of the evils plaguing Castilian society after the
mid-thirteenth century. In fact, Castile knew little stability in the 200 years
that followed what seemed to contemporaries the greatest victories and
territorial gains in the realm’s history.
Inflation, resulting from the sudden availability of new wealth from the
conquest, and food scarcity, due to the collapse of agriculture in north and
south, were major problems until the mid-fourteenth century and the
onslaught of the Black Death. Although other parts of western Europe suffered only a mild inflationary rise until the late thirteenth century, in Castile
prices began to rise rapidly as early as the 1250s. The fourteenth century
did not bring any improvements.
Economic underdevelopment
As early as the twelfth century the kingdoms of Castile and León exported
raw materials and imported finished goods, and this helped shape Spain’s
economic structure in the following centuries. Fine cloth from Flanders
SPA_C01.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 23
24 At the Dawn of a New Century
accounted for a staggering cash outflow, and imports were not limited to
luxury items but included a whole range of basic manufactured goods.
Castile’s main exports were iron, wool, hides, and livestock (especially horses,
when not banned by royal decree), grain, cordovan, wine, cumin, and
almonds. These changes in trade patterns should be placed within the
peculiar demographic and territorial transformations of the midthirteenth century. By 1250, Castile had almost doubled its territory as a
result of the conquest of Seville without any significant increase in its
population, above all after the expulsion of the Muslims (or Mudejars) from
the land after 1264. What took place was a redistribution of the population of Castile. Attracted by the new lands and by the houses, lands, and
servants that Ferdinand III and Alfonso X distributed to the conquering
armies, a considerable number of people migrated from the northern plains
to Andalusia.
Although the migration included people from all levels of society, after
a failed royal attempt to replicate the social and economic patterns of
northern Castile by settling small and independent farmers on the land,
the magnates, the military orders, and the Church received the lion’s share
of the land and income of the newly gained territories. With these great
lords came many field hands attracted by the higher wages, the climate,
and the expansion of the system of transhumance to the grazing lands of
the south. The cereal-producing areas of the north were affected by outward migration, and production decreased, causing food shortages and even
local famines. The south was not oriented toward cereal production, but
toward a wine, olive, and livestock economy. Together with the worsening
climatic conditions of the early fourteenth century and the growth of
wool exports and the Mesta (the guild of sheep herders granted royal protection in 1276), the decline of northern agriculture dealt a severe blow
to the traditional economy of Castile.
An additional problem was changes in land tenure. Although large estates
had been formed in northern Castile long before 1248, a good number of
free peasants with smallholdings retained ownership of their lands. The conquest of Seville marked the end of this way of life for many of them. After
the late 1250s, land in Andalusia was concentrated in the hands of a few
ricos hombres (rich men or magnates), the military orders, and religious
corporations. As a result of the acquisition of these rich new lands, there
was a dramatic increase in the wealth of these sectors of society without
a parallel increase in the Crown’s income. This brought about a political
and economic shift in the relationship between king and nobility.
Moreover, as a result of the conquests of Córdoba and Seville, the tribute
money paid to Castile by the kings of Andalusia (the parias) was drastically
SPA_C01.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 24
At the Dawn of a New Century 25
reduced. Alfonso X’s income from the tribute decreased by around 58 percent from that of his father, Ferdinand III, with most of the lost income
finding its way to the coffers of the ricos hombres. The magnates’ new wealth
was not used solely to the detriment of the Crown, but increased wealth
augmented their political power. The history of the century after the conquest of Seville turns, therefore, around this conflict between the Crown
and the high nobility, with the non-noble urban knights (caballeros villanos)
as the third side of the political triangle. Pressed by the magnates’ new political influence, Alfonso took two key actions: sumptuary laws against the
high nobility’s unrestricted displays and the granting of tax exemption to
the non-noble knights.
In 1255 and 1256 Alfonso X granted new privileges to the non-noble
knights of most of the Castilian and Leonese cities, exempting from most
taxes those citizens who owned houses within the city walls and who also
had horses and arms fit for warfare. As a social category, the non-noble
urban knights (there were also rural non-urban knights, that is, well-to-do
farmers who maintained horse and weapons, were liable for military service,
and received some forms of tax exemption for their services) began to play
a leading role in the affairs of the kingdom. Although the non-noble knights
dated from earlier centuries and had played significant roles in the military
affairs of the Reconquest, the royal privileges of the mid-thirteenth century
marked a turning point in the social, political, and economic history of
Castile. In less than 50 years the non-noble knights monopolized municipal
offices in most Castilian cities, bought most of the land around the cities,
and gained control, as they did in Burgos and Avila, of the most important
ecclesiastical benefices. In return the king hoped for, and often received,
their military support against the magnates and access to the cities’ fiscal
resources. Moreover, as the non-noble knights gained control of their
respective cities, they came into conflict with those below them. Pressured
from below by the disfranchised petite bourgeoisie, the non-noble knights
welcomed royal interference in the affairs of the cities and, by the 1340s,
the takeover of municipal administration by royal officials (the regimiento)
became a political reality. For a brief period, royal control of the urban
centers became one of the most significant gains of the Castilian monarchy,
but then the disorders of the late fourteenth century weakened royal
control anew.15
Territorial expansion in the east took on a different face and yielded
a very different outcome. The kings of Aragon and counts of Barcelona
had participated actively in the work of the Reconquest. Peter (Pere) II
fought with great distinction at the battle of Las Navas de Tolosa, and
the Aragonese–Catalan realm was guaranteed a sphere of influence and
SPA_C01.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 25
26 At the Dawn of a New Century
expansion in eastern Mediterranean Iberia. In 1238 James I conquered the
very rich and prosperous Muslim kingdom of Valencia. In contrast to the
pattern followed by the Castilian kings, James allowed Valencia to emerge
as an independent kingdom and to be federated with the other two older
realms: Aragon and Catalonia. After 1238 the Crown of Aragon was composed of the three entities, and James became the king of Valencia, a distinctive realm with its own parliament, laws, and, eventually, language (a
form of Catalan).
Moreover, the conquered Muslim population was not expelled from
either the cities of the Valencian kingdom or from its countryside. Most
of the Mudejar population remained on the land, carrying on the same
jobs as they had done before. The Crown of Aragon thus avoided the deep
structural and economic crises affecting Castile. The agricultural productivity of the Valencian hinterland did not diminish radically, nor were the
patterns of cultivation and basic fiscal models of exploitation altered. Unlike
in the western parts of the peninsula, agricultural production remained at
a high level, and the Mudejars preserved a profitable culture of irrigation
and husbandry until the final expulsion of the Moriscos (nominally Muslims
converted to Christianity) in the early seventeenth century. This does not
mean at all that Aragonese and Catalans (who provided the bulk of he
Christian settlers) were more understanding and tolerant than Castilians.
It means simply that they chose different, and often more efficacious, ways
of dealing with conquered people.
The conquest of Valencia, however, marked the end of Aragonese–Catalan
expansion in the peninsula. The kings of the Crown of Aragon relinquished
their rights to expansion into Murcia, and for all practical purposes looked
elsewhere for territorial gains. Aragonese and Catalan expansion to the
Balearic Islands, into Sicily (by the early 1280s), and even into the eastern
Mediterranean can only be understood in the context of a closing of the
Crown of Aragon’s frontier with Islam. Indeed, there were Aragonese and
Catalan raids upon Granada and frontier conflicts with Castile in the region
of Murcia, but these activities paled when compared to the vigor with which
the Crown of Aragon moved into other Mediterranean lands.
Valencia’s autonomy and prosperity also had unintended consequences.
One must trace to this period the slow and inexorable decline of Barcelona.
This ancient city remained a populous and important center for Mediterranean trade, but its fortunes began to be slowly eclipsed by Valencia’s
rising star. In many respects, the Crown of Aragon’s conquest of the south
had a number of consequences that were diametrically different from
those affecting Castile. They can be summarized in a few words. First and
foremost, by partially withdrawing from peninsular affairs and seeking areas
SPA_C01.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 26
At the Dawn of a New Century 27
for expansion in the Mediterranean and Italy, the Crown of Aragon
projected itself into the wider European scene and gained access to the impressive cultural revival under way in Italy. But in doing so it ceded to Castile’s
hegemony in the peninsula. Castile was the stronger of the two realms in
terms of population and resources, but in the thirteenth century it was not
altogether clear that it could eventually become the core of a developing
Spanish nation.
Second, by turning Valencia into an independent realm within the
federation of kingdoms comprising the Crown of Aragon, the kings of
the Crown of Aragon strengthened the autonomy of the individual realms
and probably made impossible any centralization of power in the future.
Castile became supreme in the peninsula because it could, as the Catholic
Monarchs did, centralize its administration; the Crown of Aragon could
not and did not wish to do so. Again and again, the rulers of Aragon,
Catalonia, and Valencia gave way to local and regional interests to the detriment of royal power. Finally, the vitality of Valencia, its vast agricultural
region, its strategic geographical location, and its easy access to North African
markets and Mediterranean ports led to its growing importance within
the economy of the Crown of Aragon. This meant the slow decline of
Barcelona, growing political strife in that city, and growing resistance to
royal authority. Barcelona could no longer serve as the economic engine
for the entire region. A whole series of other important social and political developments followed from that decline: from the growing enserfment
of peasants and the rise of political factions to growing mistrust of royal
authority. All of these factors deeply affected the subsequent history of the
Spanish eastern kingdoms and played an important role in the story that
must be told in the following chapters.
SPA_C01.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 27
Chapter 2
Medieval Spain in the Late
Middle Ages
Society and Economy
Years of Crises
A series of disasters befell all of the medieval European kingdoms during
the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries. Climatic changes led to shorter
and wetter summers and colder winters – the so-called mini-Ice Age –
which compounded the problems created by structural crises, excessive
taxation, the high cost of endemic warfare, overpopulation (in some areas
of Europe), peasant and urban rebellions, and plague. Local and regional
contexts, however, often shaped the course of each of these individual crises.
The plague, to give just one example, was the same illness everywhere, but
how individuals and authorities reacted to its onslaught differed from
place to place. The Black Death’s long-term consequences also depended
on a whole host of circumstances. We know, for example, that in Siena
the population of the city was renewed within a short period of time by
intense migration from the countryside. In England and Castile, many of
the villages wiped out by the plague and by other factors such as famine
or violence were never repopulated, and these “lost villages” disappeared
from history.
The Spanish Realms
The story or stories to be told throughout this book always unfolded within
the context of long-term structural crises – in the plural because it was the
conjunction of different types of crises that made the period so difficult –
and against the backdrop of dramatic and cataclysmic events sweeping the
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 28
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 29
peninsula from the mid-thirteenth century to the reforms of the Catholic
Monarchs. One may, of course, question the term crisis to describe such
a long period of time. Critical events became so deeply intertwined with
daily life that contemporaries were aware only of the high points of despair,
illness, and violence, and not always able to see the underlying threads that
connected one catastrophe to another. How did different peninsular social
groups change, adapt, and relate to each other in this period? How did the
economy develop or crash? How did the Crown’s response to crisis shape
its institutional and political development in this period? The success
of the Catholic Monarchs in reshaping Castile in the waning decades of
the fifteenth century could not have happened without the many royal
attempts, though often failed and incomplete, to bring some order to the
chaos sweeping Spain and to chart new social, economic, and political agendas. Remarkably and in spite of the crises, the kingdoms of Castile, the Crown
of Aragon, Navarre, and even Granada developed new and vigorous forms
of political life, new religious practices, and a dazzling cultural output.
These achievements will be explored later, but for now it might not be
improper to invoke Johannes Huizinga’s The Autumn of the Middle Ages
and to see Spanish history in the late Middle Ages through Huizinga’s
explanatory scheme: a society plagued by endemic and horrific violence
and by a morbid pursuit of fame and remembrance, yet capable of generating artistic works of rare beauty. In this world, through romance,
festivals, and knight-errantry, the upper groups in society constructed the
life beautiful: one in which life imitated art and vice versa; one in which
aesthetic pursuits stood as a bulwark against the unbearable transformations of medieval life and institutions. But it was not only about beauty
and the aestheticized life. It was also about power, and strife over who would,
in the end, wield authority.
Population
We should face first the thorny but important issue of population and of
the impact of population in the shaping of the late medieval crisis in Spain.
One of the traditional explanations for the onset of the late medieval crisis
(and I use the singular to conform to traditional ways of looking at this
period) has been to see the problems of population and production in
Malthusian terms (from Thomas Malthus’ influential work, The Essay on
Population, 1798). In this view a rise in population throughout the medieval
West from 1000 onwards created substantial population pressure on the
land. By the late thirteenth century this led to the cultivation of marginal
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 29
30 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
lands to feed the growing number of people. Cultivation of marginal lands
dramatically lowered the crops’ yield ratio, bringing shortages of food and
localized famines. Together with other factors (adverse climate, widespread
warfare, inflation, and other such critical events), these developments sent
most European societies into a downward spiral and opened the door for
far more devastating blows: the great famines of 1315–21, popular rebellions,
endemic war, and the plague.
The Malthusian explanation, however, cannot be accepted for Spain. In
the Iberian peninsula, though some local demographic pressure can be
documented, population pressure was never the problem. Paradoxically, the
feebleness of Spain’s demographic growth and the decline in the number
of inhabitants from the late thirteenth century onwards created stresses which,
although different from those affecting other Western medieval realms,
led to similar outcomes. I have already discussed in detail the causes and
consequences of the late medieval crisis in Castile, and there is no need to
explain these points in great detail once again, though further explanations
are required for the lands of the Crown of Aragon.1 Clearly, the population
shift from north to south in Castile and, to a lesser extent, in the Crown
of Aragon from Aragon and Catalonia to Valencia affected agricultural production adversely. Catalonia, for example, was severely disrupted by outward
migration into the 1350s.2 New crops in the south, the expulsion of the
Mudejars (Muslims living under Christian rule) from western Andalusia
in the mid-1260s, and the semi-enserfment of Mudejars in Valencia altered,
as has been noted in the previous chapter, social relations, the nature of
agricultural production, and patterns of trade. The rapid rise in salaries in
western Andalusia after the Castilian conquest reflected to a degree the dearth
of population and the limited availability of labor in the region. The harsh
reimposition of serfdom in Old Catalonia is yet another telling sign of lordly
desire to secure a labor force in the rearguard of territorial expansion in
the south and the lure of better wages and what seemed at the time to be
better working conditions. As we now know, this proved to be illusory and
the final outcome for peasants in southern Spain was a rather miserable
existence as landless journeymen.
From the 1250s onwards, monasteries and other ecclesiastical establishments gave their lands to peasants in long-term or perpetual leases in
growing numbers. These long-term leases were given under considerably
better terms than in previous centuries and seem to have been the only
effective means for ecclesiastical institutions to keep their holdings under
cultivation. In the early fourteenth century the ordinances of the Castilian
Cortes were a sobering reflection of the rapid decline of population and
the erosion of the tax base. Procurators attending the frequent meetings
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 30
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 31
of the Cortes requested from the Crown a reduction in taxes because of
the ills plaguing the realm (the violence of nobles, failed crops, excessive
taxation, and the like) and the obvious decline in population.
A few examples from Castile will suffice to illustrate my point. In 1304
Ferdinand IV, king of Castile, reduced the taxes paid by the town of Silos
– in this case the tax paid by the town (the fonsadera) in lieu of military
service. Ferdinand IV’s grant amounted to a 25 percent reduction in one
particular tax. Medieval rulers, often facing spiraling expenses, were seldom
willing to give up or reduce their fiscal rights. Ferdinand agreed to this reduction because the lands of Silos were “very diminished” and “very depopulated.” Alfonso XI confirmed the tax reduction in 1329, when obviously
conditions in the region of Silos had not improved at all. In Covarrubias,
the tax rolls were reduced to 54 tax payers in 1311 and the number ratified
by Alfonso XI’s regents in 1314. Covarrubias, an important town in the
region of Burgos, had only 54 recognized taxpayers contributing to the
royal fisc because of its municipal council’s insistent claims of poverty and
population decline. Further reductions in the number of contributors
were granted by Alfonso XI’s regents in 1315. Though taxpayers always tend
to exaggerate hardship and resist paying more, royal inquests yielded the
same evidence and led the Crown to accept, albeit reluctantly, the new demographic realities and diminishing tax base.3
In the harsh and violent political and economic climate of the 1320s and
1330s, villages were abandoned, the land went uncultivated and turned
to waste, and the Crown accepted a reduction in the number of taxpayers
when faced with the grim reality that Castile’s population was vanishing.
Although the Crown held on to its prerogatives as long as it could, the
realities on the ground were otherwise. In 1326, royal agents set the number
of taxpayers in Ventosa, a small village in northern Castile, at 10, but by
then the village was actually deserted; its inhabitants had fled to Navarre.
What kind of conditions could there have been at the local level when
peasants, usually bound to their villages and to the soil, found the situation so intolerable that they left their houses and lands behind and moved
elsewhere? And these were not isolated or peculiar cases. The examples are
alarmingly numerous.4
In the harsh years between 1310 and 1330 royal inquests into the rate
of taxation and the number of taxpayers still yielded roughly the same result:
an acknowledgment that there were fewer people to tax and, consequently,
the need to reduce taxes. The numerous examples found in the extant
documentation point to the link between a diminishing population and
the pressure to raise funds for the ever-increasing cost of administering the
kingdom and fighting wars. The question of course remains: how many
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 31
32 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
people lived in the Spanish kingdoms by 1300? Were there real population
losses during the more than a century and a half covered by this book?
Although it is almost impossible to provide reliable demographic information before the early modern period, García de Cortázar estimated that
Castile had around 4,500,000 inhabitants at the end of the thirteenth century, while the Crown of Aragon had over 1,000,000 inhabitants among
its three composite kingdoms. Catalonia led with over half a million, with
Aragon proper and newly conquered Valencia with over 200,000 each, while
around 80,000 lived in Majorca.5 Bisson, on the other hand, has argued
that population estimates for the Crown of Aragon have tended to be low,
projecting a population of as many as 1,200,000 for the eastern kingdoms
and as many as 6,000,000 for Castile. Whatever figure we accept (I tend
toward the lower figure), the population of the largest two Spanish realms
(neither Navarre, with around 100,000, nor Granada is included in these
calculations) pales in comparison with neighboring France, with an estimated population of 20,000,000 or more.
By the end of the fifteenth century, estimates place the population of
Spain at a lower level than it had been almost 200 years before. García
de Cortazar’s stunning comparison of estimated population figures from
around 1300 and 1480 are revealing indeed.
Demographic Changes Reconsidered
These figures, a very rough estimate and representative of the tenuous reality of medieval demography, show exceedingly modest increases in population for Aragon, Valencia, and Majorca in almost two centuries, no gains
Table 2.1 Population Comparison (1300–1480)
ca. 1300 ca. 1480
Catalonia 550,000 260,000
Aragon 200,000 250,000
Valencia 200,000 250,000
Mallorca 50,000 55,000
Navarre 100,000 100,000
Castile-León 4,500,000 4,500,000
Source: J. A. García de Cortázar, Historia de España Alfaguara II: La época medieval
(Madrid, 1973), 391.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 32
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 33
for Castile, and catastrophic losses for Catalonia. In spite of the robust economic and demographic recovery under way in 1480, the population of
the Spains was still lower than it had been in 1300. Barcelona, severely hit
by plague and by Valencia’s fierce competition, may have had a population
of around 50,000 inhabitants in 1340, making it the largest city in the peninsula, and only 20,000 in 1477, easily overtaken by booming Valencia, Seville,
and, perhaps, Toledo.6 Demographic stagnation underpins the troubled social
and political landscape of the Spanish realms and, as imprecise as these
calculations are, they speak volumes as to the harsh conditions of the period.
This does not mean at all, however, that demographic decline was universal.
Some areas – Seville and Valencia are the best examples – drained population from the north to the south. Seville became the largest city in Iberia,
reaching almost 100,000 inhabitants before the discovery of the New World.
There were opportunities for growth but not everywhere. But if Seville and
Valencia were growing at a very fast rate, and the population as a whole
was declining, what was happening elsewhere in the peninsula?
The evidence can be dramatic. In the Libro becerro de las behetrías, a large
(but partial) survey of royal, noble, and ecclesiastical fiscal rights undertaken in northern Castile in 1351 in the wake of the Black Death, the data
provides stunning evidence for the deterioration of northern Castile’s
economy and population. The evidence is horrifying. By the mid-fourteenth
century, between one-quarter and one-fifth of all the villages in northern
Castile listed in the census had been deserted (see table 2.2). In those villages
that still remained in existence, the criteria for taxation and seigneurial rights
had often been reduced from the level of the early thirteenth century,
reaffirming the area’s loss of population and economic decline.7 Clearly,
the table indicates different patterns of desertion. Villages on the plain, where
violence and plague could move swiftly from one location to another, suffered a higher rate of depopulation than fairly isolated and difficult-to-reach
mountain hamlets.
In 1349 Peter the Ceremonious, king of the Crown of Aragon, imposed
restrictions on wages and prices throughout his motley lands. Two years
afterwards, in 1351, the Cortes of Castile followed suit by imposing similar
limitations on wages and prices, a reflection of the dearth of labor and the
desire by those on top to control the job market. At the same time, in what
was quite a radical attempt, considering Castile’s long history of a free
peasantry, the Fuero viejo of Castile, reissued around the 1350s, sought
unsuccessfully to bind peasants to the soil in an attempt to secure labor
for seigneurial lands.8 Although these noble attempts to impose harsh restrictions on the peasantry and, if at all possible, to bind them to the land (replicated throughout the medieval West) failed in Castile, they were successful
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 33
34 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
in parts of the Crown of Aragon, where the Old Catalonian peasantry was
bound to the soil in even harsher conditions, and Mudejars in the Ebro
river basin (Aragon) and in Valencia’s hinterland became further bound
to their masters and to the land.
Inflation, Declining Revenues, and Violence
Population losses were deeply imbricated with other structural problems
that dominated Spanish history throughout the fourteenth and fifteenth
centuries. The first challenge to Spaniards was the rapid increase in prices
from the mid-thirteenth century onwards. Inflation delivered yet another
blow to the well-being of the Spanish realms. Attempts to impose some
controls on prices and wages appeared regularly from the 1260s into the
fourteenth century. At the 1268 ayuntamiento of Jerez (a meeting of the
Table 2.2 Deserted Villages in the Becerro
Merindad Location No. of villages No. of deserted
villages
Cerrato Plain 112 56
Infantazgo de Plain 98 35
Valladolid
Monzón Plain 97 22
Campos Plain 71 21
Carrión Plain 119 41
Villadiego Plain 107 21
Aguilar Plain and mountain 262 40
Liébana Mountain and plain 131 15
Saldaña Plain 195 42
Asturias de Mountain 207 12
Santillana
Castrojeriz Plain 121 30
Candemuño Mountain 79 18
Burgos-Ubierna Mountain 121 22
Castilla la Vieja Mountain 534 87
St. Domingo de Plain 148 26
Silos (partial)
Total 2,402 488
Source: Ruiz, Crisis and Continuity, 321.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 34
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 35
king with Castile’s urban and mercantile representatives) a strong effort
was made to control the rate of inflation, but without success. Through
the next century and a half, the ordinances of the Cortes sought to lower the
cost of credit and to ensure the availability of capital, but the repetitive nature
of these measures attests to their ineffectiveness. That attempts at fiscal
reforms and control of prices and wages often ended up being inexorably
linked to attacks against the Jews only added to the social unrest generated by deteriorating economic conditions, rising prices, and diminishing
fiscal resources.9
At the same time, while kings and parliaments (the Cortes of Castile and
the individual Cortes or Corts of the Crown of Aragon) sought to control
inflation and to reform the economy, the kings of Castile and of the Crown
of Aragon, faced with deteriorating economic conditions and the rising cost
of warfare and governance, continued to debase their coinage. In doing so
frequently and arbitrarily, they inflicted great harm on the economy and
on their people. In many respects, the history of the Spanish realms can
also be read as the progressive debasement of their respective coinages, which,
while producing short-term benefits for individual rulers, had a cumulative deleterious impact on the Spanish economy.10
Inflation, weaker coinage, and the disruption of foreign markets because
of the general western European economic downturn led to a severe decrease
in royal, as well as in noble, income. Medieval monarchies had become
quite sophisticated by the end of the thirteenth century. The new demands
of warfare and of expanding bureaucracies, combined with the growing
expenses of the court, forced kings throughout Europe to scramble for
additional sources of income. The best example of this frantic search for
money and for untapped revenue sources is Philip IV of France (1285–1314)
who, in rapid succession, savaged Jews, Lombard bankers, the Templars,
and anyone else he could get his hands on to raise badly needed cash. And
all, in the end, to no avail.11
In the Spanish realms, the kings of Castile and the Crown of Aragon,
besides profiting from the abolition of the Templars at the Council of
Vienne (1312), launched multi-pronged programs to raise funds. These
efforts were most obvious in the kings’ frequent requests to their Cortes
for extraordinary subsidies, for taxes to prevent the devaluation of the coinage
(which they immediately proceeded to devalue), for the introduction of
new taxes, for the extortion of funds from those unable to withstand relentless royal pressure – Jews, Muslims, and the Church (which under the prodding of royal claims to launch crusades against the Muslims in the south
was often drained of its resources) – and for the outright violent appropriation of new sources of income.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 35
36 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
Operating within the established parameters set by the law, the Castilian
kings requested relief from the urban representatives to the Cortes almost
on an annual basis, arguing that those funds were necessary to address the
realm’s needs. Granting the right to farm taxes or working deals with urban
representatives – who collected the taxes but who were also exempted from
them – the Castilian kings gave up some of the additional income they may
have collected by strong-arm tactics for the assurance of the urban elites’
cooperation and urban agreement to royal fiscal demands and military needs.
It was not only in the setting of the Cortes that the kings sought to work
out political deals that had, over the long run, important consequences.
In the mid-1340s Alfonso XI, in policies to be explored in greater detail
later, gained control of urban centers throughout Castile and sought to bring
peace – by interjecting royal power into urban conflicts – by reducing the
social antagonism between urban elites and those below. Although Alfonso
XI’s measure – the imposition of the regimiento (officials to administer
the towns) – was a rather complex process, it also allowed the Crown, as
it did the Catholic Monarchs 200 years later, to gain access to urban fiscal
resources.
At a time when the Castilian Crown faced a great deal of noble opposition and a renewed Muslim threat in the south – the Merinid invasion of
strategic southern ports – it needed more money. One solution was new
permanent forms of taxation. A tax of Muslim provenance, the alcabala,
instituted as a temporary measure to finance Alfonso XI’s siege of Algeciras
in 1342, became, after the Cortes’ successive extension of the original grant,
a permanent tax and an important source of income for the Crown.12 As
such, the alcabala came about as a response to a fiscal and political crisis.
Other royal attempts to meet the challenges of eroding income will be
explored in greater detail in later chapters, but, as will be seen, the experiences of the Crown of Aragon were not intrinsically different.
The Crown of Aragon
Unlike the kings of Castile, the kings of the Crown of Aragon had three
very distinct realms and troublesome representative assemblies to face in
trying to make some sense of changing social and economic conditions.
As was the case in Castile, the Crown of Aragon also suffered from sparse
population (in relation to its vast territories) and unproductive lands,
with the notable exception of the fertile Ebro river bank near Zaragoza,
the fabled huerta (gardens) of Valencia, and some areas of Catalonia and
elsewhere throughout the Aragonese realms. When one consider that the
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 36
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 37
entire population of Aragon proper probably, despite the estimates given
above, did not reach 200,000 inhabitants and that Valencia, though far richer
and more attractive, had a similar population, then one can imagine the
difficulties faced by the rulers of the Crown of Aragon in addressing the
impeding crises. Large numbers of Mudejars in Aragon and Valencia, most
of them closely dependent on the nobility, and a substantial number of
Jews in Catalonia contributed to a heterogeneous social landscape which
made raising money – who paid what and to whom? – rather difficult.
Attempts to regulate prices and wages in 1349 and 1350 had the same
limited and negative impact that these measures had in Castile. More
significantly, the diverse and often contradictory political exigencies of the
three realms forced the kings into endless compromises and concessions,
and made their ability to carry out reforms or bold economic and/or
political initiatives quite difficult. And since the Aragonese, Catalan, and
Valencian nobility commanded such lofty status and enjoyed such farranging privileges, the kings did not have an easy time dealing with them
either. They did try, however, to do the best they could. In 1346 Peter IV
ordered the minting of new gold coins, seeking to place the Catalan–
Aragonese–Valencian economy on a solid footing. He did not count on the
havoc and economic disruption brought by the plague a mere two years
afterwards, and the gold florin of Barcelona underwent frequent devaluations to 75 percent of its value by 1365.13 Remarkably, in spite of a decreasing population, plague, social unrest, and other ills, the mercantile economy
of the Crown of Aragon’s urban centers remained fairly vital, providing
some much-needed solace from the wide-ranging crises.
Violence
The royal chronicles, those of Ferdinand IV’s and Alfonso XI’s minority in
particular, are an endless tale of noble violence and disorder on the one
hand and of nobles murdered by the king’s orders on the other. Violence
did not come about solely because of the deeper crises affecting the realms,
above all demographic losses and the erosion of the tax base and noble income.
After all, a great deal of the violence resulted from an increase in political
conflict within Iberia, civil war, and the growing complexity of warfare in
the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries. One could easily argue that political instability and its concomitant, wars between the different Spanish realms,
was an intrinsic part of the larger crises of medieval society.
In considering the issue of violence and of its impact on late medieval
Spain, one cannot help but evoke Huizinga’s famous description of the
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 37
38 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
violent tenor of society. Medieval men and women lived perpetually under
the shadow of endemic violence. In the Spanish realms, the procurators
to the Cortes protested again and again against widespread violence and
bemoaned the royal inability to protect the people at the bottom from noble
excess. This was yet another indication of the failure of medieval rulers to
preserve order. But violence had different faces. Between 1300 and 1469,
the Iberian kingdoms engaged in frequent armed conflicts. Peace was, more
often than not, a short interlude between frontier skirmishes between
Christian kingdoms, raids against Muslim lands (or defenses against Muslim
counter-raids, and occasionally full-fledged military engagements). Invasions
from Morocco and Christian attempts to repel them complete this chaotic
picture (see chapters 3 and 4 below). Beyond the violence promoted and
carried out by rulers, the Iberian realms suffered the great scourge of civil
wars and of the spilling over into Iberia of the conflict between France and
England – the Hundred Years War. For the moment, it will suffice to note
that, in the decade following the devastation of the plague, Castile sank
into a bloody and disruptive civil war. French and English troops – Edward,
Prince of Wales (the famous Black Prince) and the French constable Bertram
Du Guesclin led military campaigns in Spain – roamed through the peninsula, though mostly in the western areas and in Castile, inflicting a heavy
toll on the social, economic, and political well-being of the realms.
Although conflicts between Iberian kingdoms led to large financial costs
and imposed great burdens on the faltering Spanish economies, these
wars mostly affected border areas. Most of the battles and raids took place
in those liminal and fluid spaces between kingdoms. In many respects
these conflicts were attempts to define and redefine emerging territorial
frontiers. They were costly affairs, but they were not necessarily punishing
to the general population in the rearguard of the border wars. And even
in the affected areas the local population had long learned to get out of
the way and to profit from these recurring events. At times, as for example
in the raids against Granada, there was great profit to be made in terms
of ransom, tribute, and slaves.
Civil war was another matter. Civil war in the Middle Ages did not mean
of course what it does today, involving whole populations in bloody strife
and animated by regional, ethnic, and/or religious conflicts. By civil war
– the more appropriate term may be dynastic disputes or factional conflicts
– I mean the pitting of one or several members of the royal family against
the ruler, or groups of magnates competing against each other for control
of a regency or a weak king. Such were the cases of the minorities of
Ferdinand IV, Alfonso XI, and Henry III, or the strife during the reigns of
John II and Henry IV respectively. These conflicts were in reality familial
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 38
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 39
conflicts, involving large, extended families in deathly contests for power
and prestige. If these encounters had been limited to the narrow circles at
the top they would not have been so destructive. Instead they drew vast
circles of noble retainers, servants, and bourgeois allies, creating a permanent
state of violence. Affecting the quality of daily life, the armed conflicts of
the magnates and royal families drew, into their widening maelstrom, almost
everyone in the realm.
These struggles could be kingdom-wide or localized. The perennial
strife in Barcelona between the Biga (nobles and landlords) and the Busca
(merchants, artisans, and laborers) often spilled into, and was influenced
by, the wider politics of Catalonia and the Crown of Aragon (see below).
The feudal violence in Ribagorza, where a noble family terrorized the
countryside into the late sixteenth century, is yet another indication of the
enduring nature of these problems. Most of them date from before 1300,
and they continued to plague parts of Spain long after the end of the Middle
Ages. Within this category of factional strife and as part of wider social
conflicts one may also include attacks against religious minorities (and sometimes even by religious minorities against Christians).
The real burden of violence, especially as it impacted peasants, the most
numerous and vulnerable segment of the population, was random noble
violence. Freed from constraints or fear of reprisal by the Crown’s weakness, driven by the need for more income in the face of declining revenues
and dependent peasants, many member of the nobility engaged in wanton
and predatory acts of violence. The period between 1300 and 1469 witnessed
the worst of it, and one can only understand the awe and devotion that
Ferdinand and Isabella elicited throughout their reign and in the Golden
Age if one acknowledges the disorder and pervasive violence of the century and a half before their reforms and restoration of order. This violence
ranged from noblemen scorching peaceful villages in the area of the Rioja
in the first half of the fourteenth century – leading to the peasants having
to flee their ancestral homes and abandon their fields – to urban noble
factions attacking the constable of Castile, Don Miguel Lucas de Iranzo, in
the 1460s under the cover of anti-converso riots, to the endemic strife in
urban centers between urban elites and disfranchised citizens. The latter
was most vivid in Barcelona in the already mentioned conflict between the
Biga and the Busca, but the contours of social upheaval in Barcelona were
replicated throughout Spain in the internecine violence between nobles,
citizens, and those below, and the even more appalling attacks by nobles
against defenseless peasants. In Segovia some of these disgruntled groups
burned one of the towers of the town’s cathedral in the 1320s. Alfonso XI
responded in kind, as will be seen in the next chapter, by torturing and
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 39
40 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
executing those responsible for these acts. It would require more than a
single book to illustrate in sufficient detail the heightened sense of uncertainty and the expectation of violence. One example will suffice.
The case of Ribafrecha, a small village under the jurisdiction of the
monastery of Santa María de Nájera, is instructive. The village was attacked
and sacked by a rebellious nobleman, John Ferrández de Bezla, in either
1315 or 1316, during the troubled years of Alfonso XI’s minority. The
village’s crops were burned, its gardens looted, and the remains of its defenses
– for the situation had become so dire as to force small villages to build
walls – taken over and turned into a stronghold from which Ferrández
de Bezla could scourge the surrounding countryside. When dislodged
from his ill-gotten gains by a combination of noble forces – those of John
Alfonso de Haro, a great territorial lord in the region – and the urban
militias of nearby Logroño, Ribafrecha’s unfortunate peasants had no
place to go, migrating to another location and founding a new village named
Oriemo.14 John Alfonso de Haro became a serious troublemaker later in
Alfonso XI’s reign and was murdered by order of the king.
The ordinances of the Cortes present a vivid portrait of realms burdened
by the weight of violence and the excesses of the high nobility and, quite
often, royal agents. From direct acts of violence – the usual attacks on
villages, noble-sponsored banditry, disruption of commerce – to the illegal
exaction of taxes, those at the bottom of society or religious minorities bore
the results of a deteriorating economy, the breakdown of order, and civil
strife. At the Cortes of Burgos in 1301, Ferdinand IV, king of Castile, agreed
to the procurators’ demands that powerful men (omes poderosos) cease to
buy or to grab municipal property. In addition, castles and fortresses, used
as the base for malfetrías (evil deeds) should be torn down. The same year
at Zamora, the king’s response to the urban procurators retold the grim
tale of nobles keeping gangs of malfechores who had robbed, destroyed,
and burned villages. Added to these complaints one finds descriptions of
the usual illegal appropriation of lands by nobles and military orders. No
petition to the Crown, however, could be as revealing as the one in which
the procurators to the Cortes asked the king to forbid nobles, fighting to
avenge the death of one of their men, “to kill peasants, rob them, cut their
trees and vineyards, burn [their farms], and steal their cattle.”15
During the troubled first quarter of the fourteenth century, these complaints are repeated almost verbatim in successive meetings of the Cortes:
“the malfechores who go around the land, killing and stealing and doing
great evil in the villages and in the countryside [defuera dellas] and [do so]
under the protection [se acogen] of Infantes, ricos omes, and other powerful
men.”16 These petitions portray a countryside bereft of order where powerful
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 40
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 41
nobles sponsored terror and crime. Feudal lords, firmly entrenched in castles
and strongholds, engaged in predatory behavior toward their dependent
peasant population, or, more likely, against the peasants of their enemies,
ecclesiastic institutions, and municipal councils. The peasants’ complaints,
those presented at the Cortes or those of the rebellious Hermandiños in
the late fifteenth century, have an eerie similarity to the anguished cries of
two centuries earlier illustrated in Bisson’s Tormented Voices.
17 At the end
it was not even about freedom, for at least the Castilian peasants were free;
it was about surviving in the endless disturbances plaguing the Spanish realms
from the late thirteenth century onwards.
In an important book written more than two decades ago, Salustiano
Moreta Velayos explores the relentless activities of those he called, in the
book’s title, malhechores feudales (feudal evildoers). The word malfechor or
malhechor, a term used frequently by medieval writers, was intimately linked
to the description of noble criminal activity in the ordinances of the Cortes
and other contemporary sources (malfetría). As damning as the word is,
it does not reach the level of bitterness achieved by the literary metaphors
found in the satirical and critical poetry of the next century and a half.
Written by court poets, many of them members of the high nobility, these
poems, bemoaning and unmasking the endemic violence of those on
top against those below, represent a critique from within, that is, a keen
awareness by some members of the ruling groups of what the violence
was doing to the kingdom.
In Ruy Páez de Ribera’s poem dedicated to Queen Catalina (Catherine
of Lancaster), one of the regents during John II’s tumultuous minority
(extending from 1406 to 1419), the author decries the high nobility’s disdain of honor and praise for the sake of wealth. After scorning some highborn families as worthless – the Castros and the Laras most of all – and
eulogizing the family of López Dávalos, Ruy Páez de Ribera proceeds to
paint a tragic portrait of nobles who failed to protect peasants (their duty
according to the Siete partidas and the concept of medieval society as divided
into three orders). The peasants had reached such dire straits that they were
forced to sell their clothes to satisfy moneylenders and rent collectors.18 The
same sentiments are echoed in the Coplas de la panadera which tell the story
of the battle of Olmedo (1445) and contrast the fatuousness and cowardice
of the high nobility and the peasants – in this reading peasants are vile and
cowards as well – who, caught in the middle of battle, flee the violence.
Far more damning is Iñigo de Mendoza’s satirical Coplas de Mingo Revulgo
where, in a much-quoted line, the nobility are compared to wolves and
the peasants to lambs. And, as is the case in the real world, wolves love
nothing better than to eat lambs.19
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 41
42 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
In spite of these protests, literary representations of the peasantry and
even of urban dwellers could also reach very hostile levels. The Infante Don
Juan Manuel (1282–1348), one of those aspiring to the regency during
Alfonso XI’s minority and among the greatest troublemakers in 1320s and
1330s Castile, relegated peasants and merchants to a very lowly status in
the medieval tripartite hierarchy of society. Even though Don Juan Manuel
had himself been defeated by urban militias on several occasions, in his social
formulation he could neither see the fluidity of medieval Spanish society
nor the worth and military prowess of those beneath his social rank.20
Of greater virulence were the arguments advanced by many in Catalonia
to justify the peasants’ enserfment. As Paul Freedman has brilliantly shown,
the “legend of the cowardly peasants,” that is, those who refused to fight
against the Islamic invasion or to join the Christians in fighting Muslim
lords, served to legitimize the harsh dues and the limitations on freedom
and mobility imposed on peasants throughout Old Catalonia. Bondage was,
according to this formulation, the rightful punishment for the peasants’
lack of courage and loyalty to their faith. This legitimation of oppression
had its counterpart in numerous pejorative representations of the peasantry.
Though these representations appear as a trope for all of the medieval
West (though perhaps less pronounced in Castile) and could at times be
ambiguous, they do, nonetheless, point to the troubled relationship between
those on top and those below in the context of Christianity and the fellowship of all men in Christ.21 The consequences were disastrous for the
Spanish realms and, in particular, for the peasantry. And even worse was
in store.
Famine, War, Plague, and Rebellion
It has long been a commonplace to depict the late medieval crisis as
resulting from the combined impact of four major disasters or series of
disasters. These so-called “four horsemen of the apocalypse,” to borrow
an eschatological metaphor from the biblical book of Revelation and the
title of many textbook sections on the late Middle Ages, have always been
identified as hunger (famine), war, plague, and revolution. In terms of the
general medieval West, hunger meant the devastating famine or famines
that affected most of Europe (but not Spain) between 1315 and 1321 and
killed a large percentage of the population. By war, most late medieval
chroniclers meant the Hundred Years War which, beginning roughly in 1337,
lasted into the second half of the fifteenth century and consumed most
of France, England, and neighboring realms in its wake. Rebellions or
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 42
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 43
revolutions described the peasant and urban upheavals that disrupted
most of Europe throughout the late Middle Ages – among them the Karls
in 1320s Flanders, the Pastoreaux in France and northern parts of Aragon
in the same decade, and the better-known peasant risings in France (the
Jacquerie in the late 1350s) and England (in 1381), and the bitter urban
rising of the Ciompi in Florence in 1378. Social upheavals continued
throughout the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries, as Europe adjusted to the
social and economic transformations marking the transition to the early
modern period. As for the plague or Black Death, it struck most of Europe
between 1348 and 1351, killing, depending on the location, between 25 percent and 60 percent of the population. And the plague returned every
generation into the seventeenth century.
The Spanish realms: famine
When we turn to the different Spanish kingdoms, the picture is altogether
different from that in northern Europe. For one, the great famines of 1315–21,
induced mainly by climatic changes and Malthusian pressures, did not affect
Mediterranean lands or most parts of southern Europe. As a consequence,
in 1315, a year marked by great scarcity of corn in northern Europe, Castile
exported some of its grain surplus to England. If the Spanish realms were
spared the general famine of 1315–21 this did not mean that it completely
escaped famine. But, unlike most parts of northern Europe, these famines
were either local occurrences or of short duration. Such was the case reported in the chronicle of Ferdinand IV in 1301. The description is a stark
one and reveals how contemporaries reacted to widespread hunger:
And this year there was throughout the land a very great hunger; and men
died of hunger in the squares and streets, and there was such great mortality
that . . . maybe one-quarter of all the people in the land died; and the hunger
[famine] was so great that people ate grass bread, and there never was a time
[in the history of the] world that witnessed such a great famine [hunger]
and such widespread mortality.22
Even if we allow for the typical exaggeration and literary flair of medieval
chroniclers, the presence of acute hunger among the population elicited
a response. In the far more somber ordinances of the Cortes, one finds
references to widespread famines in northern Castile in the 1340s and other
such shortages triggered by regional bad weather, violence, or demographic
decline.23 Famine, accompanied by social agitation, became endemic in
Barcelona and its hinterland after 1325 and until the plague which, by killing
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 43
44 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
many, solved some of the problems created by food scarcity. Yet in 1358, to
give an example, locusts destroyed most crops in Catalonia, creating local
food shortages, demographic losses, and social unrest. Escaping the more
widespread famines was indeed fortunate for the Spanish realms, but it did
not prevent them from suffering the perennial cycle of famines so prevalent in the Middle Ages. The relationship between food production and
population remained a precarious one in most parts of Europe until the
eighteenth century and the spread of the agricultural revolution. Spain was
no exception in that respect.
War
As noted above, the more than century and a half covered by this book
was a period of unremitting warfare. Although Spain was spared some of
the most bloody conflicts of the Hundred Years War, long and destructive
campaigns were fought in the peninsula as part of that conflict, and also
as part of the Castilian civil war of the 1360s. The Castilian fleet also saw
frequent action in the English Channel, fighting, depending whether it was
under Peter I or the Trastámara usurper, on either side of the war. Both the
Black Prince (Edward, Prince of Wales) and the French constable Bertram
Du Guesclin, undertook long campaigns in Iberia, taking sides in the conflict
between Peter I, the Cruel, and his half-brother Henry of Trastámara (see
chapter 4).
In the south, Alfonso XI had to meet the threat of the Merinids and died
himself of the plague – the only king in Europe to do so – while besieging
Gibraltar in 1350. Most of the 1340s was spent by the Castilian monarchs
resisting a Muslim invasion in western Andalusia. The kings of the Crown
of Aragon, besides dealing with internal conflicts, fought the kingdom of
Castile, and Castile fought Aragon, so many times in the period under
study as to make anyone dizzy in trying to reconstruct the details of each
particular conflict. The count-kings (a term used to identify the rulers
of Aragon, Catalonia, and Valencia) faced frequent military campaigns in
the Mediterranean, from a long and protracted insurrection in Sardinia to
military incursions in the Levant. Granada remained a point of constant
armed hostility. Wars with other Iberian kingdoms were frequent (Castile’s
wars against Portugal seem to have been as much of a recurring act as Castile’s
armed struggles against Aragon). One needs to emphasize that, although
the Spanish kingdoms did not know the full misery that was visited on
France at Crecy, Poitiers, and Agincourt (the great battles of the Hundred
Years War, all won by England), Castile and Aragon faced misery and expense
enough.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 44
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 45
Plague
Far more damning to all the Spanish kingdoms was the plague. The Black
Death, a named derived from the dark boils or bulbous growths that appeared
on the victims’ bodies, made its way from the East and entered western
Europe in merchant ships arriving in Sicily. Transmitted by flea bites or
airborne by coughing and sneezing, the plague, in its most virulent form,
was almost always fatal. The bubonic plague swept most of Europe between
1347 and 1351, though its greatest impact and virulence was felt between
1348 and 1350. Historians have estimated that between one-third and as
much as one-half of the entire population of western Europe died as a consequence of the plague, but these percentages do not reflect the grim realities brought about by pestilence. While some localities escaped unscathed
others suffered greatly or were completely wiped out.
For the Spanish realms, one must assume that the plague reached the
peninsula through eastern or southern ports, spreading inland from the
coastal areas. When this happened or how plague was carried to specific
areas is, however, not known. In Castile, the ordinances of the Cortes, the
Libro becerro de las behetrías, and the chronicles of Alfonso XI (1312–50)
and Peter I (1350–66) mention in passing the grand mortandad (the large
number of people killed by the plague). We do not have for any of the Spanish
realms the dramatic descriptions that are extant for Florence, Siena, or France:
the first-hand accounts of Boccaccio, Agnolo di Tura, and others. We do
not know precisely how many people actually died, or what were the longterm consequences of the plague, though historians have long argued about
the short- and long-term effects of the sickness. We do, however, have enough
tangential, and sometimes even explicit, information to begin to comprehend the Black Death’s devastating impact. First, as noted earlier, the only
ruler to die from the plague in all of Europe was Alfonso XI, king of Castile,
who died of the sickness in 1350 while at the siege of Gibraltar. Alfonso’s
death was a terrible blow to Castile and opened a period of civil disturbances. As for the campaigns against the Merinids, the siege had to be lifted
as the plague spread among the combatants, making military operations
impossible for a year or so.
We also know that in both the Crown of Aragon and in Castile the documentation for the period between 1350 and 1360 is sparse. It seems, as one
looks into the archives or in published collections, as if life had stopped.
The cathedral of Burgos, to give just a single example, had one of the most
active scriptoria in all of Castile, with records kept of all the grants the church
received and the chapter’s management of its benefices. Although the
number of documents extant in the cathedral archives seems to have been
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 45
46 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
declining from the 1320s onwards – perhaps as a reflection of the crises –
for the 15 years between 1350 and 1365 the number drops dramatically.
Table 2.3, reflecting extant holdings in cathedral and monastic archives
throughout the region, may help us understand how the plague slowed down
the pace of life in northern Castile. At the cathedral of Burgos there are no
extant documents for the period between October 2, 1349 and March 9,
1350, reflecting perhaps the height of the plague’s impact on the city. The
table also shows the uneven reaction to the spread of the pestilence, even
in areas which, as is the case on the institutions mentioned in the table,
were close to each other and all connected by the pilgrimage road.
Material transactions – selling and buying of lands, land leases, and other
economic exchanges – declined precipitously. The few such transactions
extant for the period point to a world in which, at least in some localities,
it was hard to find labor. There are extant agreements in which a landowner
would give half of his property away to someone in return for five years
of labor on his remaining half. The rents which the cathedral of Burgos
collected from farms and mills dropped by almost half, and in the case of
mills, where extant sources allow us to trace the movements of rents over
decades, not only did the cost of renting a mill fall by 50 percent or more,
but the cathedral chapter was unable to find clients for some of its mills.
The attempts to set prices and introduce wage controls at the meeting of
the Castilian Cortes in 1351 also reflected the dearth of labor and the need
to secure workers at a reasonable price. In Castile, as has been noted, there
were also failed attempts to impose harsh work obligations on agricultural
labor and to tie peasants to the soil. The latter was an unprecedented move
in a land, such as Castile, without a history of bondage.
Spanish historians have long argued that the population levels existing
in Spain before the Black Death were not restored until the end of the fifteenth
century and the beginning of the sixteenth. That is, it took almost a century
Table 2.3 Number of Documents Extant in Northern Castile, 1350–1369 (partial)
Place 1330–9 1340–9 1350–9 1360–9
Burgos cathedral 76 68 41 34
Mons. San Juan 9 7 1 2
Santo Domingo 13 4 9 8
de la Calzada
Albelda and Logroño 15 27 19 17
Source: Ruiz, Crisis and Continuity, 320.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 46
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 47
and a half to return to the pre-plague level. Whether because of the plague
or because of deteriorating economic conditions that had plagued the region
from the 1250s onwards, in the great Libro becerro de las behetrías, a great
survey of peasants’ fiscal obligations to their ecclesiastical, noble, and
royal lords undertaken in 1351, more than one-fifth of all the villages in
northern Castile were either deserted or had experienced drastic demographic
decline. Many of these villages were never repopulated and remained only
as slowly vanishing references to their previous existence in later documents
(see table 2.2 above).
In the Crown of Aragon, especially in Barcelona and its hinterland, the
information is far more precise. Local histories, such as that of Girona, point
to rates of mortality fluctuating between 25 and 35 percent, but in the nearby
plain of Vic and its eponymous diocesan center as many as two-thirds of
the population may have been killed by the pestilence. Catalonia seems to
have been particularly hard hit, the plague taking almost half of its population. There, more than anywhere else, the plague may have had a devastating and long-term impact. Recurrences of the illness, though not always
with the same etiology or with anything approaching the same mortality
rate, took a heavy toll on the lives and morale of people in Catalonia and
elsewhere in Spain. In the case of Barcelona, and by extension Catalonia,
the plague may have been the most important factor for the city’s and the
region’s decline in the late Middle Ages.
Other social, cultural, and psychological consequences emerged from the
plague years. Not different from other parts of Europe, the Black Death
unleashed long-simmering anti-Jewish sentiments in many parts of Spain.
Although violence against the Jews and, to a lesser extent, against the Muslims
was not universal, blaming religious minorities for the catastrophes in
Barcelona, Valencia, and other areas set the stage for even more widespread
violence in 1391. Since these attacks, though triggered by the plague, are
part of the much larger history of Christian, Jewish, and Muslim relations,
they will be examined in greater detail in chapter 7. For now, one must
remember what a tragic mix it was. As the plague struck down people
indiscriminately (and Jews and Muslims in equal or larger ratios), one of
the favorite responses to the pestilence’s onslaught was to attack, rob, and
kill Jews and Mudejars. The plague was not just about one getting sick
and most probably dying. It was also about providing new openings for
violence and social upheaval, and challenging the ability of medieval rulers
to preserve order and protect their subjects.
The Black Death came also in the wake of demographic losses and dislocations, of violence by a rapacious nobility, of almost endemic internecine
conflict. The plague encouraged selfishness and punished selflessness – those
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 47
48 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
who fled usually lived, those who stayed and helped the sick usually died.
The sickness must have had a deleterious impact on the people who lived
through the horror. The morbidity of daily life, the vivid representations
of death and dying in contemporary art, the new cults of suffering, and
other such responses are all echoed in the General Dance of Death (written
in the late fourteenth century), and in the pessimistic poetry of the period,
such, as for example, Rabbi Sentob of Carrión’s Proverbios morales (see
chapter 8). These and other works, with their emphasis on death, gave a
pessimistic and lugubrious patina to the age. The plague may have been
after all just another one of the many problems besetting society, but its
impact was swift and profound.
Rebellion
The history of social risings in the Spanish realms in the late Middle Ages
is a complex and contradictory one. In most parts of western Europe either
the failure of the nobility or the Crown’s rapacity led to a complete breakdown of the social order and to widespread and large regional uprisings.
Remarkably, the Spanish realms witnessed such risings only on the periphery and never at the centre. Social conflicts were of course widespread
throughout Spain. These ranged from vocal and violent encounters at the
meetings of Castilian municipal councils, when disfranchised taxpayers
came to protest the urban patriciate’s social and political monopoly of urban
institutions – as can be deduced from Alfonso XI’s charter creating the
regimiento (see chapter 6) – to peasant raids on each other’s properties or
their refusal to pay rents to their ecclesiastical lords. There was in Spain
during the Middle Ages a permanent level of violence and resistance.24 Along
the same pattern, anti-Jewish and anti-Muslim violence or the urban disturbances at Alcaraz, chronicled in detail by Angus MacKay, can also be
seen as part of an enduring legacy of violence against noble oppression
or social inequality. Nonetheless, neither in Castile, Aragon, or Valencia
do we find large uprisings. Large regional rebellions had to wait for the
sixteenth century: the comunero revolt in Castile in 1521, the Valencian
Germanías in the same year, and the risings in Aragon in 1592. And even
these uprisings were very different from each other, with only the Germanías
having a real popular flavor.
I have long been intrigued by the absence of large uprisings at the
core of the medieval Spanish realms, especially considering how troubled
social and economic conditions were. Only the year 1391, which witnessed
widespread attacks against the Jews, approached the level of contemporary
rebellions in the rest of Europe. My own attempts to answer these questions
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 48
Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages 49
have so far been unsatisfactory and inconclusive, and only a multiperspectival
explanation can be offered. The ebb and flow of the Reconquest and the
constant conflict with the Moorish kingdoms provided a release for
pent-up anger. Raids against Muslim lands in a society where most males,
regardless of social filiation, were liable for military service was a form of
escape from irreconcilable social tensions. The martial nature of the Castilian
monarchy and its non-sacral character (see chapter 6) also eliminated some
of the religious motivations for widespread resistance. In other words, there
is no evidence of the kind of millenarian agitation found, for example, in
the 1381 English risings or in the Hussite upheavals in fifteenth-century
central Europe. The targeting of Jews, conversos, and, to a lesser extent,
Muslims as victims of popular unrest also worked to fend off direct confrontations with the established order. It is true that anti-Jewish violence
was partly an attack against those above, specifically the Crown and the
nobility. Jews and conversos were clearly identified as being complicit with
the Crown and the nobility as tax farmers, collectors, and administrators.
In Morvedre, as Mark Meyerson has shown, Jews served as the town’s
baillis in the late thirteenth century to endless complaints by the Christian
population.25 For these reasons and other social and economic factors
that are not easily perceptible as deterring rebellion – a large wool export
economy in Castile after 1350 and the importance of the transhumance,
tribute from Jews and Mudejars – neither of the two main kingdoms of
Aragon and Castile witnessed widespread popular unrest.
But the Spanish realms did have a popular uprising which was peculiar
in many respects. The revolt of the remenças (peasants bound to the soil who
had to pay a fee, a remença, to obtain their freedom) in northern Catalonia
lasted for more than two centuries, making it more of a long-term insurgency
than an actual rebellion. The remenças uprising included alliances between
the king of the Crown of Aragon and the peasants against elements of the
high nobility and even commercial urban interests. As such the remenças
were not typical of the fourteenth- and fifteenth-century uprisings elsewhere in Europe, which pitted those below against those on top. Their
rebellion was instead part of a complex political process; the outcome was
a political one as well. Remença representatives were so well organized and
capable as to be able to travel to the Neapolitan court of Alfonso V, the
ruler of the Realms of Aragon, sometime between 1450 and 1455 after the
king had granted the peasants the right of association in 1448. Although
they could negotiate directly with the Crown, the Old Catalonian peasants’
rebellion was not, as Paul Freedman has pointed out, “the revolt of a confident, privileged segment of the peasantry, throwing aside a few vestigial
and annoying rights. It was, rather, a hard-fought struggle over seigneurial
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 49
50 Society and Economy in the Late Middle Ages
power.”26 They had real grievances. Their status and the harsh conditions
(mals usos) under which they labored and lived were completely out of step
with conditions elsewhere in Europe and the rest of Iberia. The remenças
were serfs and, as such, bound to the soil, toiling under heavy social and
economic burdens, open to predatory lordly assaults on their women and
daughters. One of their grievances was precisely the exploitation of their
women, who were drafted as wet-nurses to the prejudice and ill health of
their own children. And, finally, remenças were quite unique in that they
were successful! At the Sentencia of Guadalupe (1486), Ferdinand II, king
of the Crown of Aragon and consort to Isabella of Castile, granted the peasants the right to purchase their freedom. This they did, moving from bondage
to freedom and from dismal conditions to relative prosperity by the end
of the Middle Ages and the beginnings of the early modern period.
One is almost forced to ask, at the end of this litany of disasters and
crises, how the Castilians, Aragonese, Catalans, and Valencians managed to
endure. Endure they did. The crises themselves were not as monochrome
or as continuous as depicted here. They endured because rulers and subjects strove doggedly against the troubles of the age. Long ago my teacher,
Joseph R. Strayer, wrote about the promise of the fourteenth century and
how, in the midst of great catastrophes, the institutions and cultural revival
of the late fifteenth century were forged as a response to the evils of the
time. It is to these responses and promises that we turn now.
SPA_C02.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 50
Chapter 3
The Answers of Politics
Spain, 1300–1350
Faced with what seemed almost insurmountable challenges, Spanish rulers
developed political strategies and programs, seeking to ameliorate the tide
of plagues, bad weather, civil strife, and general violence. These responses
were not always successful or even consciously undertaken. To begin with,
many of the difficulties were, as has been seen, the outcome of the selfishness of the nobles or of the urban elites’ political maneuvering on behalf
of their own interests. More often than not, some measures, meant to
alleviate specific problems, only worsened them. But slowly over the century and a half between 1300 and 1469, administrative, institutional, and
cultural foundations were laid down that allowed for a restoration of
central authority and for Spain’s eventual ascendancy to the forefront of
the European powers by the end of the Middle Ages.
Introduction
In examining the responses to crises, this chapter and the next three will
provide brief chronological accounts of political developments in medieval
Spain’s two core polities: the kingdom of Castile and the Crown of Aragon.
There is certainly a plethora of good political narratives for the period under
study, and these three chapters make liberal use of them. But to tell what
happened is not enough. Questions to be raised in these chapters, and to
be reprised later on in chapter 6, are: How did kings in this period relate
to the nobility, to the Cortes, and to the cities in their respective realms?
What were the relations between Castile and the Crown of Aragon, and
between the core realms and other kingdoms in Iberia and Europe? What
sort of institutional reforms were implemented? How successfully? What
was the nature of kingship in both areas?
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 51
52 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
These questions barely begin to tap the ebb and flow of social and political transformations that occurred in this period. Special attention must also
be given in a separate chapter (chapter 7) to Christians’ relations with the
Jews and Muslims in their midst. The changing royal treatment of religious
minorities was also a manifestation of and a response to the instability of
the late Middle Ages. Similarly, culture in general, from changes in religious
observance and extravagant festivals to the writing of romances and other
literary creations, represented yet another response to the harsh realities
of daily life in fourteenth- and fifteenth-century Spain (see chapter 8).
In describing political developments in the Iberian peninsula one is always
faced with the unresolved question of chronological periodization. Kings
in each of the realms did not rule precisely at the same time; nor do extraneous temporal landmarks – the plague or the violence against the Jews
in 1391 – though peninsula-wide phenomena, provide proper chronological boundaries. For the sake of clarity, I have divided the description of
political life into three periods. The first one begins shortly before 1300
and extends to 1350 for Castile and to the end of the reign of Peter IV, the
Ceremonious, in 1387 for Aragon. For Castile, our terminus is a logical
one, as 1350 coincided with the worst onslaught of the Black Death and
with Alfonso XI’s death. For Aragon, Peter IV’s long and productive reign
is almost a period unto itself. A second chronological set runs between 1350
in Castile and 1387 in Aragon to the Compromise of Caspe in 1412 when
the regent of Castile, Ferdinand of Antequera, was elected king of the Crown
of Aragon. From 1412 onwards one family, the Trastámaras, ruled Castile,
the Crown of Aragon, and, by the early half of the fifteenth century,
Navarre as well. Chapter 5, therefore, carries the story from 1412 to the
marriage of Ferdinand of Aragon and Isabella of Castile in 1469 and to the
early years of Isabella’s reign in 1474, when Ferdinand succeeded to the Crown
of Aragon. Close familial ties in this later period did often generate far more
problems than encourage peaceful cooperation.
Castile, 1300–1350
Ferdinand IV (1295–1312)
Ferdinand IV’s short – a mere 17 years, of which six were taken by his
minority and a bitterly contested regency – and undistinguished reign
came closer to the political fragmentation of the kingdom than at any other
time during the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries. His rule saw a further
increase in the high nobility’s demands for a share in the political and
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 52
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 53
economic administration of the Castilian realm and in their arrogance and
wanton violence. The early fourteenth century also witnessed the selfish
and disruptive behavior of the princes of the blood. It seems that in the
late Middle Ages, above all in Castile, there were always far more younger
members of the royal family than was necessary for the health of the
kingdom or for an orderly royal succession. And, finally, balancing all these
unwelcome developments, the weakness of the Crown prompted the urban
elites and representative assemblies of Castile (Cortes) to take on new responsibilities and power.
In 1300 Ferdinand IV, born on December 6, 1285, ruled over the diverse
kingdoms that comprised Castile-León. Having become king on the death
of his father, he inherited not only the extensive political troubles left by
Sancho IV, but also the contested claims to his rule. His parents’ marriage
had been declared an uncanonical union. His own father, Sancho IV, had
illegally and against the wishes of his own father and king, Alfonso X, set
aside his nephew Alfonso de la Cerda’s rightful claims to the throne and
wrested the Crown from him by force and rebellion. In reality, old Castilian
custom gave Sancho the right to the throne, but Alfonso X’s Siete partidas
(not a legal code in force at that time) emphasized the right of primogeniture
and Alfonso de la Cerda’s (the son of Alfonso X’s first deceased child) right
to the throne. Thus Sancho IV came to the throne on the basis of flimsy
claims, and his own father had cursed him on his deathbed and willed the
throne elsewhere.1 Sancho IV’s reign is already described in great detail by
Peter Linehan in an earlier volume in this series.2 Sancho was not a fool
or an incompetent ruler, though he was rather brutal in dealing with his
enemies. He had, however, done something very right. His wife and queen,
María de Molina, was a woman of extraordinary abilities, character, and
resourcefulness. Becoming a regent for her son in 1295, she was able to
balance and neutralize the princes of the blood, who wished for nothing
better than to despoil the kingdom, or even capture the crown.
In spite of María’s abilities, the six years between Ferdinand IV’s ascent
to the throne and his coming of age in 1301 were troubled years indeed.
Though, as we have seen in chapter 2, serious economic problems were in
the making in this period, for contemporaries the crisis was mostly about
politics and power. C. González Mínguez, one of the few recent scholars
who has studied Ferdinand IV’s reign in detail, describes the period
between 1295 and 1301 as the harshest in the enduring “civil war” besetting the country. The six-year regency, longer than usual, was dominated
by the figure of the queen mother and by her efforts to restore order and to
find support for her vulnerable son. An early tentative regency or governing council was organized in the wake of Sancho’s death. It included Don
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 53
54 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
Gonzalo, the powerful archbishop of Toledo, the Infante Henry (Don
Enrique, a younger brother of Alfonso X, uncle to Sancho IV, grand-uncle
to Ferdinand IV, and a major troublemaker in the mid-1250s), and Don
Nuño González de Lara, a representative of the high nobility. Cancelling
an unpopular tax that had been levied by Sancho IV and that negatively
affected commercial exchanges, the queen mother and her lukewarm and
unreliable allies sought to secure urban support for the young king.
María de Molina’s initial efforts were not particularly successful. The Infante
John (Don Juan), taking a leaf from the book of the previous king, his brother
Sancho IV, declared himself the rightful king in western Andalusia with
the support of Muslim allies. At the other end of the kingdom, in eastern
Castile, Don Diego López de Haro, brother to the recently murdered Don
Lope Díaz de Haro, marched westward and reclaimed the lordship of Vizcaya,
appropriated by the Crown after his brother’s death in 1288. Betrayed by
her allies, the Laras and the Infante Henry – each of them keenly eager to advance
their own particular agenda – the queen mother turned to the municipal
councils as the last bulwark for the preservation of royal authority and as
the only defenders of the Crown against noble ambitions.
In a behavior pattern – specially in periods of troubled and contested
minorities – repeated numberless times from the mid-thirteenth century
to the rule of the Catholic Monarchs, most of the Castilian towns and most
of the urban representatives to the Cortes rallied to the defense of the realm.
This they did not do out of selfless love for the monarch and monarchy,
though most of the main northern Castilian cities – Avila, Burgos, Segovia,
Valladolid, and others – proved remarkably loyal to the Crown, but because
the high nobility’s anarchic actions were terrible for business and because
the king was the ultimate source of urban privilege and tax exemption.
At the Cortes of Valladolid (1295) María de Molina came close to complete
defeat, her son’s reign tilting in the balance. Her fellow co-regents betrayed
her, pursuing their own alliances and seeking to gain as much from the
process as possible. Initially the urban oligarchy of Valladolid had even refused
her and her son entry into the city. Yet at the Cortes of Valladolid, while
the queen mother granted the urban procurators the right to collect taxes
and to control fortresses in their respective cities’ hinterlands, she gained
precious support for her son. The Cortes recognized Fernando IV as the
rightful king. These actions thwarted other noble pretenders to the Crown
and signaled the urban centers’ commitment to the survival of the dynasty
and to order.3 This pattern, imitated in future minorities and during some
of the most difficult stretches in Castilian history, did not always work or
lead to similar outcomes, but it worked fairly well sufficient times to preserve royal authority. The great Isabella herself made her claims to the Crown
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 54
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 55
legitimate because of similar circumstances and the towns and Cortes’ support. That is, the threat of noble rebellion often drew the towns of Castile
into action in support of the king. That meant substantial fiscal resources
and formidable urban militias placed at the Crown’s service.
In the case of María de Molina and her son, Ferdinand IV, the issues
were quite complex. Gaining urban support meant substantial concessions
to the towns and the recognition of extensive urban autonomy. In many
respects the history of Castile and, after 1474, Spain, is the history of the
Crown’s sustained efforts to erode or roll back urban privileges that had
been granted in times of need. In 1295, however, the civil war troubling
Ferdinand IV’s minority led to the growing political role of urban centers
and of procurators attending the frequent meetings of the Cortes. In the
early fourteenth century, the Crown could not endure without urban support, and out of that need arose the decision to reckon with the urban elite’s
place in the governing of the realm and the heavy price to be paid for an
alliance with urban centers. To gain Ferdinand IV’s recognition as the legitimate heir and king, the Crown had to bribe its noble, ecclesiastical, and
urban allies with concessions which limited royal authority and diminished
its fiscal and political control of the realm.
The political ebb and flow of the young king’s first year are too complex and involved to detail here fully. The Infante John’s claims to the throne
with the support of the king of Granada and, initially, with that of the king
of Portugal, turned the struggle for the regency into an international conflict.
The Portuguese monarch’s intrusion into the conflict over the regency and
the near-anarchy of Castile’s succession politics drew substantial territorial
concessions from María de Molina and an offer of marriage between
Ferdinand IV and a Portuguese princess. This diverted a full Portuguese
invasion, but did not buy full Portuguese cooperation. In the east, James II
(Jaume II), king of the Crown of Aragon, also entered the fray, pushing
into Castilian territory (specially in the area of Murcia), while supporting
the claims of Alfonso de la Cerda to the throne. In 1295–6 Castile had been
invaded on every front. In the west, the Portuguese, after their fleeting alliance
with María de Molina and her son, turned their backs on their promise
and allied once again with the rebellious Infante John. In the south and
the east, armies from Granada and Aragon entered Castile and occupied
substantial territory. That year, two claimants to the throne – the Infante
John, who had been crowned king in the ancient city of León, and Alfonso
de la Cerda, who, according to primogeniture and Alfonso X’s will, had
the best claim to the throne – forcefully moved to establish their claims to
the realm. In the case of Alfonso de la Cerda, besides the Aragonese support, his claims had been recognized by the king of France. As this was
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 55
56 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
not enough, in the northeast the powerful noble clan of the Haros and other
thuggish noblemen created havoc throughout the region.
Only by understanding this free for all can one also understand to what
extent the Castilian structural crises had a grim counterpart in the political arena. Only by seeing how desperate the situation was in 1295–6 can
one judge the achievements of María de Molina in ushering her son to his
majority and to his inheritance. As we come to the close of the thirteenth
century, Castile stood on the edge of a precipice. Only the queen mother’s
ceaseless toil and her cunning use of bribes and concessions permitted the
survival of a united realm. One real possibility in 1295–6 would have been
a reversal to the fragmented kingdoms of earlier centuries. León, Asturias,
and Galicia may have re-emerged as distinct kingdoms. Most of Andalusia
could have become a la Cerda-ruled new realm. The Castilian political
quandaries around 1300 only point to the fragility of most medieval political constructions in this period in spite of the progress kings had made
in establishing their authority in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries. They
also reaffirm – and this is worth repeating – the tremendous achievements
of María de Molina in keeping her son’s inheritance fairly undiminished
in the face of such opposition.4
Even after Ferdinand IV came of age in 1301, the troubles did not abate,
nor did, for that matter, the queen mother’s tireless efforts on behalf of
Castile and her son. As Ferdinand approached his majority, a series of
circumstances helped turn the tide somewhat. First and foremost, the nobles
were, as would be the case throughout the next 150 years, unable to act
together with a single purpose. Gains by one faction of the nobility or
familial clan immediately provoked the mistrust and opposition of other
noble groups. The high nobility (magnates, ricos hombres) remained a painful
thorn on the side of the Crown, but they could seldom agree on a long-term
agenda. At the same time, James II, ruler of the Realms of Aragon, faced
mounting difficulties and challenges in his own kingdoms, thwarting his
interference in Castile and his support for war there. Eventually he had to
turn his attention to pressing internal matters in the Crown of Aragon,
abandoning Alfonso de la Cerda’s cause. And the Castilian economy
seems to have improved slightly, in spite of the political disturbances and
a ferocious famine (see chapter 2). This allowed María de Molina and her
son to make further fiscal concessions in a renewed search for urban and
noble support. Also important for the survival of Ferdinand IV’s rule
was the papal bull which legitimized Sancho IV and María de Molina’s
children in 1301. The papal decision removed the most useful excuse – that
Ferdinand IV was illegitimate – from those seeking to overthrow the king.
The manner in which the queen mother borrowed from the vast symbolic
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 56
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 57
and festive resources available to medieval rulers is worth the telling.
When rumors began to circulate that the papal bull was a forgery, she ordered
a solemn mass at the cathedral of Burgos. After the mass concluded, she
had the papal document read to the throngs of nobles and citizens of Burgos
assembled in the cathedral.5
In spite of this papal affirmation of the king’s legitimacy, intermittent
warfare between the Spanish realms and between factions of the nobility
and the Castilian Crown continued at a steady pace during the years after
Ferdinand IV’s assumption of the Crown as an adult in 1301. As late as 1304,
Aragonese control over most of Murcia was still under arbitration. And
although negotiations that year – coupled with the death of the scheming
Infante Henry – led to Alfonso de la Cerda’s renunciation of his claims
to the Castilian throne and the return of most of Murcia to Castile, the
Aragonese still kept some important territorial gains in the region, including the cities of Alicante and Orihuela and other strategic places.6
In the topsy-turvy world of Castilian politics, the fierce struggle between
Castile and Aragon gave way in 1306 to an alliance against Granada and
to a complex triangular relationship between the North African Merinids,
Castile, and Aragon against Granada’s ruler, Muhammad III (1302–9). So
much for the Reconquest! Though the Merinids had been, and remained,
a far greater threat to Castile than Granada, Ferdinand IV was willing to play
the diplomatic game in the hope of gains on his southern frontier. The
capture of Gibraltar in August 1309 was perhaps the most notable military
success of his otherwise undistinguished rule, but even that victory proved
ephemeral. A treaty with Portugal, including a marriage to a Portuguese
royal Infanta, brought some semblance of peace to the western frontier and
diminished Portuguese support for rebellious nobles there. Yet this limited
success was paid for, as noted above, by significant territorial losses to the
Crown of Aragon. At home, the endemic violence, greed, and arrogance
of the high nobility and royal princes set the stage for further troubles in
the near future. When, on September 7, 1312, Ferdinand IV, barely 27 years
old, died of maladies the nature of which historians are not fully agreed
on (probably a heart attack), his son, Alfonso XI, not yet 1 year old, inherited
a troubled kingdom and a rebellious and troublesome nobility. And, once
again, the aging María de Molina had to rush to the breach to try to save
her grandson’s throne, as she had done her son’s.
Alfonso XI (1312–1350)
One of the most interesting rulers of medieval Castile, Alfonso XI’s reign still
awaits some enterprising historian to provide us with a political biography
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 57
58 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
and full study. Many of the documents from his long reign have now been
published, and together with the chronicle(s) detailing the many and varied
events that took place during it, these sources provide a formidable window
onto Castilian society in the first half of the fourteenth century.7
Alfonso XI’s 38-year rule can be divided into two distinct periods.
Having become king when he was barely a year old, during the first 13 years
of his reign, from 1312 to 1325, Castile was ruled by a regency in which
María de Molina played a significant role until her death in 1321. As in
most periods of minority, despite María de Molina’s resourcefulness, the
prevalent mood was one of anarchy and factional struggles between the
king’s uncles and other relatives, the high nobility, and the urban elites.
As already seen, the onset of the late medieval crisis hit Castile particularly hard in the 1310s and 1320s. Contemporary accounts, above all the
chronicle of Alfonso XI, decried the waves of violence and the spoiling of
the realm. Most of the regents – the regency was a veritable carousel which
regents got on and off depending on political circumstances – took little
or no action to address the violence sweeping the land. Either because of
their incompetence or greed, or because inaction (or the wrong action)
was the way to secure the support of some faction of the high nobility, most
of the regents followed policies which ran counter to the interests of the
young king or the realm.8
The regency drew some familiar faces from Ferdinand IV’s minority
17 years earlier. María de Molina, Alfonso XI’s grandmother, again took
on the central responsibility for defending the Crown. Her son and Alfonso
XI’s uncle, the Infante Peter (Don Pedro), also played a central role. The
Infante John, Alfonso XI’s grand-uncle and Sancho IV’s brother, became
an important figure in the new regency as well. This was the same Infante
John who rebelled against Ferdinand IV and attempted to wrest the crown
from the minor king between 1295 and 1301. His presence, almost as co-equal
to María de Molina, speaks volumes about the fluidity of Castile’s political landscape and the unsavory alliances that political exigencies forced
upon those who ruled. In early documents from Alfonso XI’s reign (1313,
1314, and so on), the queen mother is described as “my grandmother and
tutor with whom is now la chancillería [the administrative and judicial royal
authority] [as well] as the Infante Don Juan my tutor.”9 It is significant to
note that María de Molina had kept control of the chancery in her hands.
In later documents, the Infante Peter (Don Pedro), the king’s uncle, is also
mentioned as tutor, completing the first cast of regents. Most of the documents issued by these three in Alfonso XI’s name – except for traditional
confirmations of privileges – attest to deteriorating economic conditions
or to growing disorder throughout Castile. As seen in chapter 2, these
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 58
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 59
charters usually granted specific localities a reduction in the number of
taxpayers because of the poverty of the land, the loss of population, and
the excesses of the magnates.10 Some other documents include royal letters
ordering inquests into the abuses of royal officials and nobles.
In the great privileges (the so called documentos rodados) issued by the royal
chancery and confirmed by the princes of the blood, the high ecclesiastical
dignitaries, great nobility, and important royal officials, one can see a list
of the entire cast of characters involved in the political disturbances plaguing Alfonso XI’s minority. And since they are listed in a strict hierarchical
order, one can also assume their respective power in relation to the king
and to the regency, and, one should also add, responsibility for the disorder of the age. In a 1315 royal confirmation, the names of these political actors appear in a descending column of witnesses to the document.
First and foremost we have the names of the main tutors, the Infantes John
and Peter, followed by another member of the royal family, the Infante Philip
(Don Felipe), soon to claim a significant place in the affairs of the realm.
They are followed by the archbishops of Toledo and Compostela, the great
ecclesiastical lords in the realm, and then Don Juan Manuel (his name is
preserved here in the Castilian form because of his literary fame), a noted
writer and an ambitious and perennial troublemaker who, through his descent
from the beloved Ferdinand III (1217–52), claimed a leading role in Castilian
affairs, even pretending the throne. We will see him in open conflict with
Alfonso XI for the next three decades. This cast of great men, gathered at
Burgos in August 1315, also included the heads of the leading noble families:
de Haro, Saldaña, Mendoza, and others.11
Significantly, a mere month earlier, same year, same city, and in the
presence of Alfonso XI and his regents, urban procurators from towns and
cities throughout the realm joined around 100 fijosdalgo (lower nobility,
hidalgos) to create an hermandad (see chapter 6 below), a league to combat
the abuses of the powerful and to protect the property and interests of
citizens and lower-ranking nobility. From every corner of the kingdom
representatives from 98 different locations (more than 200 procurators
altogether) came to Burgos. We know all these representatives by name,
and in many cases – certainly those of Burgos, Avila, and other urban
centers – can trace them back to the local documentation and place them
within the specific social world of merchants and the urban patriciate.
Towns sending representatives included some of the important cities in
the realm – Burgos, Soria, Osuna, Segovia, Avila, León, Salamanca (but not
Valladolid, Toledo, or Seville), a large number of leading Galician towns
(but not Compostela), Andalusi, and Extremaduran urban centers, and
coastal towns on the Bay of Biscay.12
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 59
60 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
This impressive urban showing illustrates the unusual alliance of urban
interests with the lower nobility. They stood together, though often their
fiscal and social interests were at odds, as a bulwark against the anarchic
activities of some of the regents and magnates, and their bands of “feudal
malefactors.” In many respects, many things had changed from the previous minority. In 1295, María de Molina had been able to assert his son’s
legitimacy and with that his line’s claims to the throne. Although some sought
to assail Alfonso XI’s right to rule, those doing so now stood on shakier
ground. There was no serious attempt in 1315 to partition the kingdom,
as had been the case in the concluding years of the thirteenth century; nor
did Castile face serious foreign interference. Alfonso XI was, after all, the
son of a Portuguese princess. The kings of the Crown of Aragon were caught
up in Mediterranean and North African campaigns (see the discussion
of the Realms of Aragon below and chapter 5) and could be placated by
marriage alliances. Granada was mired in civil war, and Navarre was seriously neglected by its French masters. Far more important, the urban procurators to the Cortes, who had already been granted their wish to share
in the governance of the realm during the troubled minority of Ferdinand
IV, now took more decisive steps to bind the future and the survival of
the monarchy to the cities. Political circumstances as well as her own proclivities led María de Molina to forge strong ties with patrician elites in
the late thirteenth century. This alliance between the king and urban
centers had its origins in the twelfth century and proved beneficial to
both parties. The cities needed the Crown as much as the Crown needed
the cities. In 1315 that alliance was reinvigorated, giving María and her
grandson some breathing space to weather the storm.
In 1319 the Infantes Peter and John, both dominant members of the
regency, died in battle on the Granada frontier. Immediately other claimants
for control of the young king emerged, opening a new round of conflict.
Yet another Infante John, son to the Infante of the same name, appears as
guardian of the king in 1322, a year after María de Molina’s death, but the
Infante Philip and the always contentious Don Juan Manuel made sure
they obtained as much profit from the confusion as possible. The latter
arranged for the marriage of his daughter to the still minor king, hoping
to control the Crown as the king’s prospective father-in-law. But Alfonso
XI surprised them all.
A mere 14 years old, Alfonso XI came of age in 1325 and immediately
claimed to be able to rule on his own. And this assumption of his duties
as king was accompanied by swift and bold deeds. As soon as Alfonso took
these steps, the Infante John rose in open defiance of the king. Lured to a
parlay at the village of Toro, Alfonso had the Infante John and his retinue
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 60
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 61
murdered, following this act with the immediate confiscation of John’s lands
and their absorption into the royal domain. Assassination of disruptive nobles
and their followers continued apace throughout the next decades.13 Having
dealt with the most immediate threat, Alfonso traveled to Segovia, where
urban strife had led to the burning of one of the cathedral’s towers. There
he dispensed harsh justice to the guilty, cutting off their feet and hands,
breaking their backs on the wheel, beheading some, and burning others.
In the meantime, Don Juan Manuel, learning about the young king’s
decisive actions, abandoned his post as adelantado (the official in charge
of the frontier) on Granada’s border and fled to his own estates in Murcia.
The king responded swiftly by reneging on his promise to marry Don Juan
Manuel’s daughter and made plans instead to marry the daughter of Afonso
IV, king of Portugal. Since the Aragonese king has his attention focused
on his own affairs, Alfonso had now the freedom to address the internal
upheavals plaguing the realm.
Rather than provide a detailed description of Alfonso’s long reign, it may
prove far more useful to summarize some of its high (and low) points.
Alfonso undertook important matrimonial alliances to secure international recognition and stability. His marriage to the Portuguese Infanta María
brought peace, at least for a while, to his western frontier. His own sister
Doña Leonor’s marriage to Alfonso IV, king of the Realms of Aragon,
brought peace on the eastern frontier. Don Juan Manuel was forced to
submit and to pledge allegiance to the king (if only temporarily before reverting to his old practices) in 1329. Two years afterwards, in 1331, Alfonso
de la Cerda, whose claims to the throne had so endangered Ferdinand IV’s
reign, renounced, once and for all, his claims to the throne in return for
a substantial bribe. In 1332 in a peculiar ceremony which will be glossed
in some detail in chapter 6, the king was knighted by the mechanical arm
of a statue of St. James on the main altar of the cathedral in Santiago de
Compostela, anointed on the shoulder, and crowned himself at the great
royal Cistercian monastery of Las Huelgas de Burgos amidst great popular
festivities.
In the south the rulers of Granada had been emboldened by Castile’s
internal strife, carrying out daring raids in western Andalusia. In addition,
the Merinid rulers of Morocco entered into an alliance with Granada, now
beginning to be pressed by Alfonso XI’s energetic military forays in the
frontier. Gibraltar fell to the Merinids in 1333, a devastating blow to the
prestige of Alfonso and a critical strategic loss for Mediterranean and Atlantic
seafaring. In the peninsula’s confusing (a term which I use frequently in
these pages) political atmosphere, main characters and alliances shifted from
year to year. Thus, in spite of his marriage ties to Portugal, Alfonso XI’s
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 61
62 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
neglect of his queen and his open devotion to his mistress Doña Leonor
de Guzmán led to worsening relations with the Lusitanian kingdom. Aragon
was always suspicious of Alfonso XI’s claims, specially after 1333 when
the Castilian king signed a temporary peace with Morocco and Granada.
Granada was of course always troubled by North African advances into the
peninsula and reluctant to embrace fully and permanently an anti-Castilian
coalition. Moreover, the perennial struggle for power within Granada’s
ruling families also meant that a new ruler, emerging from fratricidal plots,
might completely change his political allies.
Throughout Castile, as much as Alfonso XI strove to restore order, violence
by the nobility continued in the area of the Rioja and elsewhere, and abuses
by royal agents and the high nobility remained a disturbing reality in the
realm. Don Juan Manuel, though he had pledged fealty to the king, remained
an active promoter of disorder jointly with Don Juan Núñez, Don Juan
Alfonso de Haro, and other high nobles. The king’s main focus, however,
remained the frontier. After the fall of Gibraltar and the pressing Merinid
threat, the ida contra los moros, the raids against Muslim lands, became
central to Alfonso XI’s policies. Not only did they appeal to the young king’s
chivalrous nature and crusading spirit – he has just founded the knightly
order of La Banda, along the lines of but chronologically preceding the
foundations of the orders of the Garter in England and the order of the
Star in France – but it was also good policy. Campaigns in the south siphoned
a good number of restless nobles away from troublemaking at home to a
search for gains and service to the Crown. The lure of the great profit to
be made always served as a powerful incentive. War against Granada or
Morocco made collecting taxes and subsidies much easier. The Cortes and,
most of all, a very pliant Church, could never resist the appeal of yet another
crusade against Islam.
Alfonso XI’s personal rule was therefore divided into attempts to restore
order in northern and central Castile and frequent campaigns in the south
against the Merinid and Granada’s threat. Indeed a new Moroccan invasion
brought a temporary cessation to the hostilities between Castile, Aragon
(after Peter IV’s ascent to the throne), and Portugal. With strong Portuguese
support, Alfonso XI routed the Moroccan army on the banks of the river
Salado on October 30, 1340. The battle checked any further threat of a North
African invasion for the foreseeable future and represented the high point
of Alfonso XI’s military enterprises and reign. The chronicles gave the
victory a signal place in their narrative, reflecting the importance that contemporaries, after a long lull in the Reconquest, attributed to the battle. It
was followed by the sieges of Algeciras (taken in 1344) and Gibraltar, where
the king died of the plague in 1350. Alfonso’s victories began to promote
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 62
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 63
in earnest, though much delayed by internal problems, Castile’s longstanding claims to North Africa.14
On the home front, Alfonso XI carried out an important legislative
reform at the Cortes of Alcalá de Henares in 1348 and forcefully curtailed
urban autonomy and strife by naming royal officials to municipal posts
(see chapter 6). Thus, in spite of the different crises that plagued his reign
– violence of the nobles, demographic decline, international strife, and
localized famines – the king made great strides toward restoring order and
setting the realm on the right course.
All these things, however, he undid by his marital practices. His obvious
disdain for his wife, and his love for his mistress, Doña Leonor de Guzmán,
sowed the seeds for endless trouble after his death. Alfonso XI’s legitimate
and only heir was Peter (Pedro) I, but with Leonor he had a large number
of children, most of them sons. To them he gave large estates, important
positions, and titles. These grants included the mastership of the order
of Santiago with all the fiscal and military resources associated with the
order. The king’s bastards, known collectively as the Trastámaras (from one
of the titles given to the oldest, Henry [Enrique] of Trastámara), became
first in the land, to the great and justified resentment of the Queen María
and the heir Peter. When Alfonso XI died, refusing to abandon the siege
of Gibraltar because of the appearance of the plague, his body was escorted
to Seville by his bastard children and Leonor de Guzmán’s relatives. But before
entering Seville, they abandoned the cortège for fear of Peter’s reprisals. In
the next two decades and for many years afterwards, there would be hell
to pay for Alfonso’s having made his mistress Leonor and their many
children together his real family in terms of affection and gifts.
The Crown of Aragon, 1300–1387
The Crown of Aragon’s political developments in the fourteenth and early
fifteenth centuries were shaped by three significant events in the previous
century. Although these developments are explained in careful detail in an
earlier volume in this series, we should note, even if briefly, these landmark
events. They were, first, the battle of Muret (1213), in which Peter II (1196–
1213), king of Aragon and count of Barcelona, died defending Catalonian
rights in southern France and, ironically for a king known as “the Catholic,”
the heretical Albigensians from northern crusaders. Peter’s defeat had
important consequences for the Aragonese–Catalan realms. Although the
Crown of Aragon remained a player north of the Pyrenees, for all practical purposes Catalonian hopes for hegemony in ancient Occitania were
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 63
64 The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350
now at an end. This new political reality was ratified at the treaty of Corbeil
(1258), in which James I gave up Aragonese–Catalan claims throughout
most of Occitania.
Second, these losses may have become palatable because in 1238, James
I, one of the greatest kings to rule the Crown of Aragon, conquered the
kingdom of Valencia and its eponymous capital city. The taifa kingdom of
Valencia was a rich prize indeed. With fertile and well-irrigated lands, the
fabled huerta (garden) of Valencia, worked, after the Christian conquests,
by the great husbandry skills of Mudejars, was one of the most fertile and
productive agricultural regions in the entire peninsula. The capital city,
Valencia, benefited from a great port and soon rose to be one of the great
commercial entrepôts of Iberia, overtaking Barcelona in terms of population and commercial activity. Valencia was thus ideally located for forays
into the western Mediterranean and North Africa. The city and kingdom
also had a substantial Muslim or Mudejar population whose members
remained important contributors to the Valencian economy. Instead of being
expelled as was the case in western al-Andalus, the Mudejars remained on
the land, to the great profit of their lords and the kingdom. Far more significantly, even though Valencia was conquered by an army of Aragonese and
Catalans, James I chose not to annex his newly conquered kingdom to
either Aragon or Catalonia or to partition it. Instead, he created a new political entity within the Union (the formal agreement joining Aragon and
Catalonia). As such Valencia emerged as a distinct realm with its own laws,
representative assembly, and equal status with the other two kingdoms.
Third, in the thirteenth century, the Crown of Aragon became deeply
involved in Mediterranean affairs. Upon James I’s death, the three realms
of the Crown of Aragon (Aragon, Catalonia, and Valencia) went to his
firstborn son, Peter (Pere, who ruled as Pere III in Aragon and Pere II in
Catalonia), and the new kingdom of Majorca, with Perpignan as its administrative center, and rights to Montpellier and other lands north of the
Pyrenees, went to his second son James (Jaume) II. Although faced with
the usual unrest, Peter III soon pacified the Crown of Aragon, opening the
door for ventures in the Mediterranean.
The most important of his moves was the capture of Sicily. Sicily was
an important island in the Mediterranean, serving, once in Aragonese–
Catalan hands, as a link between the Crown of Aragon’s eastern and western
Mediterranean markets. Sicily had a rich history and tradition. Under
Frederick II, the great Hohenstaufen ruler and German emperor, Sicily had
acquired a prominent place in Europe’s political world. After Frederick’s
death in 1250, a coalition of French and papal forces hounded his successors
and imposed, against the wishes of the Sicilian people, a French dynasty
SPA_C03.qxd 23/5/07 11:13 AM Page 64
The Answers of Politics, 1300–1350 65
on the island. It did not last very long. On March 30, 1282, the people of
Sicily rose up in arms against the French, put them to death, and called
the Aragonese king to come and claim the island (Peter III had claims to
the island through his marriage to Constance, Frederick’s descendant).
In reality, it was not so simple. The Aragonese king had been preparing
for the conquest of Sicily for more than a year and, under the cover of
a crusade in North Africa, an Aragonese–Catalan fleet was strategically
placed off the coast of Sicily ready to land. It was, as Thomas Bisson has
argued, one of the easiest annexations of a realm to the Crown of Aragon.
Far more significantly, the Sicilian Vespers allowed Spanish entry into the
Italian peninsula.15
